North Carolina statutes. Chapter 131E. Health Care Facilities and Services.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 131E-1.
Definitions.

As used in this Chapter, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Department” means the Department of Health and Human Services.

“Person” means an individual, trust, estate, partnership, or corporation including associations, joint-stock companies, and insurance companies.

History.

1983, c. 775, s. 1; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a).

Cross References.

As to criminal provisions for patient abuse and neglect, see

G.S. 14-32.2

.

Funds for Case Management Pilot Program.

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 11F.5A, provides: “It is the intent of the General Assembly to reduce avoidable emergency department readmissions and emergency department boarding times among individuals with behavioral health needs. To that end, of the funds appropriated to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services, the sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2017-2018 fiscal year shall be allocated for the development and establishment of a two-year pilot program at a hospital in Wake County to support a hospital-based, comprehensive community case management program. The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services, in consultation with LME/MCOs responsible for the management and provision of mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse disorder services in Wake County under the 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver, shall oversee the development and establishment of the pilot program to ensure it is designed to reduce avoidable emergency department readmissions and emergency department boarding times among individuals with behavioral health needs. The pilot program shall be conducted at the hospital in Wake County with the largest number of emergency department visits that agrees to participate in the two-year pilot program authorized by this subsection.

“By December 1, 2020, the Department shall submit a report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research Division evaluating the effectiveness of the pilot program in reducing avoidable emergency department readmissions and emergency department boarding times among individuals with behavioral health needs.”

§ 131E-2.
Contested case hearing petition time limit.

Except as otherwise provided in this Chapter, a petition for a contested case that is authorized by this Chapter shall be filed in the Office of Administrative Hearings within 30 days after the Department mails written notice of an agency decision to the person filing the petition. This section shall not be construed to create any right to file a petition for a contested case that is not otherwise granted in this Chapter.

History.

1991, c. 143, s. 1; c. 761, s. 23.

§ 131E-3.
Coordination of rules on pathological materials.

The Division of Health Service Regulation, Department of Health and Human Services (Department), shall adopt rules governing the procedures regarding the request for and release of pathological materials made to clinical laboratories within the jurisdiction of the Department. These rules shall be consistent with the North Carolina Hospital Association Best Practices Principles and the College of American Pathologists 2003 Professional Relations Manual and shall be developed in consultation with the North Carolina Medical Board to ensure consistency in procedures governing pathological materials.

History.

2013-43, s. 1.

§ 131E-4.

Reserved for future codification purposes.